Missouri, session 2026, HB1940.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 108.240, 115.125, 115.127, 493.050, and 493.070, RSMo, are
repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 108.240,
115.125, 115.127, 493.050, and 493.070, to read as follows:
108.240. 1. Before any general obligation bearer bond or general obligation
registered bond, hereafter issued by any county, township, city, town, village or school district
or special road district or fire protection district or by virtue of the provisions of chapters 243,
245, 248, and sections 242.010 to 242.690 for any purpose whatever, shall obtain validity or
be negotiated:
(1) If such bonds are in bearer form, such bonds shall first be presented to the state
auditor, who, other provisions of law notwithstanding, shall certify by manual or facsimile
endorsement of such bonds that all conditions of the laws have been complied with in its
issue, if that be the case, and also that the conditions of the contract, under which they were
ordered to be issued, have also been complied with and the evidence of that fact shall be filed
and preserved by the auditor. The state auditor may endorse bearer bonds with the auditor's
facsimile signature in lieu of manual signature after filing the auditor's manual signature,
certified by the auditor under oath, with the secretary of state; and
(2) If such bonds are in registered form, the proceedings relating to the issuance of
such registered bonds shall first be presented to the state auditor, who shall examine the same
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SCS HB 1940 2
and shall issue a certificate that such proceedings comply with all conditions of the laws, if
that be the case, and also that the conditions of the contract, under which they were ordered to
be issued, have also been complied with, and the evidence of these facts shall be filed and
preserved by the auditor. The state auditor shall also maintain the following information: the
name of the issuer of the bonds; the amount thereof; the maturity dates thereof; the interest
rates thereon; and the provisions with respect to prepayment, if any.
2. Such bearer bonds after receiving the said certificate of the auditor as herein
provided and such registered bonds after the issuance of the said certificate as herein provided
shall thereafter be held in every action, suit or proceeding in which their validity is, or may
be, brought into question, prima facie, valid and binding obligations, and in every action
brought to enforce collection of such bonds, the certificate of such auditor, or a duly certified
copy thereof, shall be admitted and received in evidence of the validity of such bonds,
together with the coupons thereto attached if any; provided, the only defense which can be
offered against the validity of such bonds shall be for forgery or fraud. But this section shall
not be construed to give validity to any such bonds as may be issued in excess of the limit
fixed by the constitution, or contrary to its provisions, but all such bonds shall, to the extent of
such excess, be held void; and provided further, that the remedy of injunction shall also lie at
the instance of any taxpayer of the respective county, city, town, village, township or school
district or special road district or fire protection district or drainage district or levy district to
prevent the registration of any bonds, alleged to be illegally issued or funded.
3. For purposes of subsection 1 of this section, once the time period set forth in
section 115.557 has expired, if no election contest has been brought, all conditions of
chapter 115 shall be deemed as having been complied with in the issuance of the bond.
115.125. 1. Not later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Tuesday prior to any election,
except a special election to decide an election contest, tie vote or an election to elect seven
members to serve on a school board of a district pursuant to section 162.241, or a delay in
notification pursuant to subsection [3] 2 of this section, or pursuant to the provisions of
section 115.399, the officer or agency calling the election shall notify the election authorities
responsible for conducting the election. The notice shall be in writing, shall specify the name
of the officer or agency calling the election and shall include a certified copy of the legal
notice to be published pursuant to subsection 2 of section 115.127. The notice and any other
information required by this section may, with the prior notification to the election authority
receiving the notice, be accepted by email or facsimile transmission prior to 5:00 p.m. on the
tenth Tuesday prior to the election[, provided that the original copy of the notice and a
certified copy of the legal notice to be published shall be received in the office of the election
authority within three business days from the date of the facsimile transmission.

SCS HB 1940 3
2. In lieu of a certified copy of the legal notice to be published pursuant to subsection
2 of section 115.127, each notice of a special election to fill a vacancy shall include the name
of the office to be filled, the date of the election and the date by which candidates must be
selected or filed for the office. Not later than the sixth Tuesday prior to any special election to
fill a vacancy called by a political subdivision or special district, the officer or agency calling
the election shall certify a sample ballot to the election authorities responsible for conducting
the election.
3.] 2. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and 115.359, if there is no additional
cost for the printing or reprinting of ballots or if the political subdivision or special district
calling for the election agrees to pay any printing or reprinting costs, a political subdivision or
special district may, at any time after certification of the notice of election required in
subsection 1 of this section, but no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
election, be permitted to make late notification to the election authority pursuant to court
order, which, except for good cause shown by the election authority in opposition thereto,
shall be freely given upon application by the political subdivision or special district to the
circuit court of the area of such subdivision or district. No court shall have the authority to
order an individual or issue be placed on the ballot less than eight weeks before the date of the
election.
115.127. 1. Except as provided in subsection 4 of this section, upon receipt of notice
of a special election to fill a vacancy [submitted pursuant to subsection 2 of section 115.125],
the election authority shall cause legal notice of the special election to be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in its jurisdiction. The notice shall include the name of the
officer or agency calling the election, the date and time of the election, the name of the office
to be filled and the date by which candidates must be selected or filed for the office. Within
one week prior to each special election to fill a vacancy held in its jurisdiction, the election
authority shall cause legal notice of the election to be published in two newspapers of
different political faith and general circulation in the jurisdiction. The legal notice shall
include the date and time of the election, the name of the officer or agency calling the election
and a sample ballot. If there is only one newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction,
the notice shall be published in the newspaper within one week prior to the election. If there
are two or more newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction, but no two of opposite
political faith, the notice shall be published in any two of the newspapers within one week
prior to the election.
2. Except as provided in subsections 1 and 4 of this section and in sections 115.521,
115.549 and 115.593, the election authority shall cause legal notice of each election held in its
jurisdiction to be published. The notice shall be published in two newspapers of different
political faith and qualified pursuant to chapter 493 which are published within the bounds of

SCS HB 1940 4
the area holding the election. If there is only one so-qualified newspaper, then notice shall be
published in only one newspaper. If there is no newspaper published within the bounds of the
election area, then the notice shall be published in two qualified newspapers of different
political faith serving the area. Notice shall be published twice[, the first publication
occurring in the second week prior to the election, and the second publication occurring]
within [one week] six weeks prior to the election. Each such legal notice shall include the
date and time of the election, the name of the officer or agency calling the election and a
sample ballot; and, unless notice has been given as provided by section 115.129, the second
publication of notice of the election shall include the location of polling places. The election
authority may provide any additional notice of the election it deems desirable.
3. The election authority shall print the official ballot as the same appears on the
sample ballot, and no candidate's name or ballot issue which appears on the sample ballot or
official printed ballot shall be stricken or removed from the ballot except on death of a
candidate or by court order, but in no event shall a candidate or issue be stricken or removed
from the ballot less than eight weeks before the date of the election.
4. In lieu of causing legal notice to be published in accordance with any of the
provisions of this chapter, the election authority [in jurisdictions which have less than seven
hundred fifty registered voters and in which no newspaper qualified pursuant to chapter 493 is
published,] may cause legal notice to be mailed [during the second week prior to the election,
by first class mail,] within six weeks prior to the election to each registered voter at the
voter's voting address and published once in one or more newspapers in the county. An
election authority may exclude from this mailing any voter that is designated as an
inactive voter pursuant to section 115.193. All such legal notices shall include the date and
time of the election, the location of the polling place, the name of the officer or agency calling
the election and a sample ballot.
5. If the opening date for filing a declaration of candidacy for any office in a political
subdivision or special district is not required by law or charter, the opening filing date shall be
8:00 a.m., the [seventeenth] sixteenth Tuesday prior to the election. If the closing date for
filing a declaration of candidacy for any office in a political subdivision or special district is
not required by law or charter, the closing filing date shall be 5:00 p.m., the [fourteenth]
thirteenth Tuesday prior to the election, or if the thirteenth Tuesday prior to the election
is a state or federal holiday, the closing filing date shall be 5:00 p.m. on the next day that
is not a state or federal holiday. The political subdivision or special district calling an
election shall, before the [seventeenth] sixteenth Tuesday, prior to any election at which
offices are to be filled, notify the general public of the opening filing date, the office or offices
to be filled, the proper place for filing and the closing filing date of the election. Such

SCS HB 1940 5
notification may be accomplished by legal notice published in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in the political subdivision or special district.
6. Except as provided for in sections 115.247 and 115.359, if there is no additional
cost for the printing or reprinting of ballots or if the candidate agrees to pay any printing or
reprinting costs, a candidate who has filed for an office or who has been duly nominated for
an office may, at any time after the certification of the notice of election required in
subsection 1 of section 115.125 but no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Tuesday before the
election, withdraw as a candidate pursuant to a court order, which, except for good cause
shown by the election authority in opposition thereto, shall be freely given upon application
by the candidate to the circuit court of the area of such candidate's residence.
493.050. All public advertisements and orders of publication required by law to be
made and all legal publications affecting the title to real estate shall be published in some
daily, triweekly, semiweekly, or weekly newspaper of general circulation in the county where
located, and [which] such a newspaper shall have:
(1) Been admitted to the post office as periodicals class matter in the city of
publication; [shall have]
(2) Been either:
(a) Published regularly and consecutively for a period of [three years] one year,
except that a newspaper of general circulation may be deemed to be the successor to a defunct
newspaper of general circulation, and subject to all of the rights and privileges of said prior
newspaper under this statute, if the successor newspaper shall begin publication no later than
[thirty] ninety consecutive days after the termination of publication of the prior newspaper;
[shall have] or
(b) Purchased or newly established by a newspaper that satisfies the
requirements of paragraph (a) of this subdivision; and
(3) A list of bona fide subscribers voluntarily engaged as such, who have paid or
agreed to pay a stated price for a subscription for a definite period of time[; provided, that
when].

Ifa public notice[,] required by law to be published once a week for a given number of weeks
[, shall] is to be published in a daily, triweekly, semiweekly, or weekly newspaper, the notice
shall appear once a week, on the same day of each week[, and further provided, that]. Every
affidavit to proof of publication shall state that the newspaper in which such notice was
published has complied with the provisions of this section[; provided further, that]. The
duration of consecutive publication provided for in this section shall not affect newspapers
which have become legal publications prior to September 6, 1937[; provided, however, that
when]. Ifany newspaper shall be forced to suspend publication in any time of war, due to the

SCS HB 1940 6
owner or publisher being inducted into the Armed Forces of the United States, the newspaper
may be reinstated within one year after actual hostilities have ceased, with all the benefits
provided pursuant to the provisions of this section, upon the filing with the secretary of state
of notice of intention of such owner or publisher, the owner's surviving spouse or legal heirs,
to republish such newspaper, setting forth the name of the publication, its volume and
number, its frequency of publication, and its readmission to the post office where it was
previously entered as periodicals class mail matter, and [when] if it [shall have] has a list of
bona fide subscribers voluntarily engaged as such who have paid or agreed to pay a stated
price for subscription for a definite period of time. All laws or parts of laws in conflict with
this section except sections 493.070 to 493.120, are hereby repealed.
493.070. In all cities of this state which now have, or shall hereafter have, a
population of one hundred thousand inhabitants or more, all public notices and
advertisements, directed by any court[,] or required by law to be published in a newspaper,
shall be published in some daily newspaper of such city, of general circulation therein, which
shall have been established and continuously published as such for a period of at least [three
consecutive years] one year next prior to the publication of any such notice.
✔